Missouri, session 2026, HB2599.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 59.319, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 59.319, to read as follows:
59.319. 1. A user fee of four dollars shall be charged and collected by every recorder
in this state, over and above any other fees required by law, as a condition precedent to the
recording of any instrument. The state portion of the fee shall be forwarded monthly by each
recorder of deeds to the state director of revenue, and the fees so forwarded shall be deposited
by the director in the state treasury. Two dollars of such fee shall be retained by the recorder
and deposited in a recorder's fund and not in county general revenue for record storage,
microfilming, and preservation, including anything necessarily pertaining thereto. The
recorder's funds shall be kept in a special fund by the treasurer and shall be budgeted and
expended at the direction of the recorder and shall not be used to substitute for or subsidize
any allocation of general revenue for the operation of the recorder's office without the express
consent of the recorder. The recorder's fund may be audited by the appropriate auditing
agency, and any unexpended balance shall be left in the fund to accumulate from year to year
with interest.
2. An additional fee of [three] nine dollars shall be charged and collected by every
recorder in this state, over and above any other fees required by law, as a condition precedent
to the recording of any instruments specified in subdivisions (1) and (2) of subsection 1 of
section 59.330. The fees collected from this additional [three] nine dollars per recorded
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2599 2
instrument shall be forwarded monthly by each recorder of deeds to the state director of
revenue, and the fees so forwarded shall be deposited by the director in the state treasury.
3. The state treasurer and the commissioner of administration shall establish an
appropriate account within the state treasury and in accordance with the state's accounting
methods. Any receipt required by this section to be deposited in the state treasury shall be
credited as follows:
(1) The amount of one dollar for each fee collected under subsection 1 of this section
shall be paid to the state treasurer and credited to the "Missouri Land Survey Fund" which is
hereby created to be utilized for the purposes of sections 60.510 to 60.620 and section 60.670.
The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund and may approve disbursements from the
fund in accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180. Any funds previously collected by the
state treasurer to be utilized for the purposes of sections 60.510 to 60.620 and section 60.670
shall transfer to the Missouri land survey fund. Any portion of the fund not immediately
needed for the purposes authorized shall be invested by the state treasurer as provided by the
constitution and laws of this state. All income, interest, and moneys earned from such
investments shall be deposited in the Missouri land survey fund. Any unexpended balance in
the fund at the end of the fiscal year is exempt from the provisions of section 33.080 relating
to the transfer of unexpended balances to the general revenue fund;
(2) The amount of one dollar for each fee collected under subsection 1 of this section
to an account to be utilized by the secretary of state for additional preservation of local
records; and
(3) The amount of [three] nine dollars collected under subsection 2 of this section
into the Missouri housing trust fund as designated in section 215.034.
✔